Utah statutes.
31A-2-206.   Receipt and handling of deposits.
(1)  As used in this chapter:
(a)  "Custodian institution" means a financial institution in this state as
defined under Section 7-1-103 that:
(i)  has authority under Title 7, Chapter 5, Trust Business, to engage in a
trust business; and
(ii)  is approved by the commissioner to have custody of deposited securities,
whether physically, through the Federal Reserve book-entry system, or through
a clearing corporation as defined under Subsection 70A-8-101(1).
(b)  "Federal Reserve book-entry system" means the computerized system
sponsored by the United States Department of the Treasury and certain other
agencies and instrumentalities of the United States for holding and
transferring securities of the United States government and other agencies and
instrumentalities.
(2)  Subject to the commissioner's approval and to the requirements of this
section, the state treasurer shall accept, and a custodian institution
qualified under Subsection (1)(a) may accept:
(a)  deposits required or permitted under this title or rules adopted under
this title;
(b)  deposits of domestic insurers or of alien insurers domiciled in this
state if required by the laws of other states as a prerequisite to authority
to do an insurance business in other states; and
(c)  deposits resulting from application of any retaliatory provisions of this
title.
(3)  Deposits authorized under Subsection (2) shall be of securities described
in Subsection (7).
(4)  Unless otherwise provided by the law requiring or permitting the deposit,
each deposit shall be held in trust:
(a)  first, for administrative costs under Subsection 31A-27a-701(2)(a);
(b)  second, for the claimants under Subsection 31A-27a-701(2)(c);
(c)  third, for the claimants under Subsection 31A-27a-701(2)(d); and
(d)  fourth, for all other creditors in the order of priority established
under Section 31A-27a-701.
(5)  A claim may be made against the deposit of an alien insurer only if it
arises out of a transaction in the United States.
(6)  Deposits may be made by:
(a)  delivering physical custody and control of the deposited security to the
state treasurer or a custodian institution, accompanied by a statement signed
by the depositor indicating that the deposit shall be held in trust under the
terms of this section and subject to the commissioner's exclusive direction
until control is released by the commissioner; or
(b)  delivering to the commissioner, on a form adopted by rule, a signed
certificate of a custodian institution, describing securities qualifying for
deposit under Subsection (7) that are on deposit with a clearing corporation
or held in the Federal Reserve book-entry system in the name of the custodian
institution, in trust for the purposes stated under this section, and that
these securities are subject to the exclusive direction of the commissioner
and may not be withdrawn or transferred by any person, including the insurer
owning the securities, without the commissioner's written approval.
(7) (a)  Deposits may consist of any securities authorized in Subsection
(7)(b) for which there is a ready market if they:
(i)  are expressly approved by the commissioner;
(ii)  are subject to disposition by the state treasurer or custodian
institution only with the concurrence of the commissioner; and
(iii)  are not available to any other person except as expressly provided by
law.
(b)  The authorized securities are:
(i)  deposits or certificates of deposit insured by the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation;
(ii)  bonds or other evidences of indebtedness that are guaranteed as to
principal and interest by the United States;
(iii)  tax anticipation bonds or notes, general obligation bonds, or revenue
bonds of this state or of any county, incorporated city or town, school
district, or other political subdivision of this state, if the bonds or notes
are rated AAA by Standard and Poor's or an equivalent nationally recognized
rating agency;
(iv)  bonds or other evidences of indebtedness issued or guaranteed by an
agency or instrumentality of the United States; and
(v)  any other security approved by the commissioner that the commissioner
considers an equivalent grade investment to those enumerated under Subsections
(7)(b)(i) through (iv) based on tests of the safety of principal and
liquidity.
(8)  Securities held on deposit shall be valued under Section 31A-17-401 as
those investments are valued for life insurers, or at market, whichever is
lower. The securities shall be revalued whenever the commissioner requests to
ensure continued compliance with the requirements of this title.
(9) (a)  The state treasurer or custodian institution shall:
(i)  deliver to the depositor a receipt for all securities deposited or held;
(ii)  issue a duplicate copy of the receipt to the commissioner; and
(iii)  permit the depositor to inspect its physically held securities at any
reasonable time.
(b)  On application of the depositor or when required by the law of any state
or country or by the order of any court of competent jurisdiction, the state
treasurer or custodian institution shall certify that the deposit was made and
what is on deposit.
(c)  Depositors, the state treasurer, any custodian institution, and the
commissioner shall each keep a permanent record of securities deposited or
held under this section and of any substitutions or withdrawals. They shall
compare records at least annually.
(10)  A transfer of a deposited security, whether voluntary or by operation of
law, is valid only if approved in writing by the commissioner and
countersigned by the state treasurer or custodian institution.
(11)  Neither a judgment creditor nor other person may levy upon any deposit
held under this section.
(12)  A depositor that has complied with all provisions of this title intended
to preserve its financial solidity is, while solvent and complying with the
laws of this state, entitled to:
(a)  receive interest and cash dividends accruing on the securities held for
its account; and
(b)  substitute for deposited securities other eligible securities, as
expressly approved by the commissioner.
(13)  Within 45 days after the commissioner gives notice to a depositor that a
deposit is not an acceptable deposit under Subsection (7), the depositor shall
substitute other eligible securities expressly approved by the commissioner
and allowed under Subsection (7).
(14)  A depositor may voluntarily deposit or transfer control of eligible
securities in excess of requirements to absorb fluctuations in value and to
facilitate substitution of securities.
(15)  Upon the depositor's request and upon approval of the commissioner, any
deposit or part of a deposit shall be released to, or on order of, the
depositor to the extent not needed to satisfy requirements of this title. On
the order of a court of competent jurisdiction, the deposit or appropriate
part of the deposit shall be released to the person for whom it is held.
(16)  Each depositor shall pay the cost of custody of securities by a
custodian institution or by the state treasurer.
(17)  The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section.
